Utah statutes.
4-8-5.   Unlawful acts specified.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in the production, processing, handling, marketing, sale or distribution of products of agriculture to:

(1)  discriminate in price between two or more producers with respect to products of agriculture of like grade and quality;

(2)  use any brand, label, container, or designation on products of agriculture not authorized by the department;

(3)  promote or advertise the price of any product of agriculture which is required to be graded without displaying the grade of such product with prominence equal to that of the price; or

(4)  make or permit the use of any false or misleading statement on any label or stencil affixed to a container or package containing products of agriculture or in any promotion or advertisement of such products.

